Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,118
Interstate bridges; boundary line or boundary line toll bridge; department; gift; power to accept; conditions.

The department shall have the power and authority to accept title to and responsibility for the maintenance of that portion of any boundary line bridge or boundary line toll bridge, and the land, real or personal property, or easement or interest necessary thereto, located within the State of Nebraska whenever that portion of any such bridge may be offered to the State of Nebraska free of costs and indebtedness by the person holding title thereto; Provided, that any such acceptance given by the department shall be conditioned upon the adjoining state holding or acquiring title to that portion of such bridge, and the land, real or personal property, or easement or interest necessary thereto, located within the adjoining state from the person holding title thereto.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 28, p. 645.